Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-508
Practice of speech-language pathology, defined.

Practice of speech-language pathology means the application of principles and methods associated with the development and disorders of human communication skills and with dysphagia, which principles and methods include screening, assessment, evaluation, treatment, prevention, consultation, and restorative modalities for speech, voice, language, language-based learning, hearing, swallowing, or other upper aerodigestive functions for the purpose of improving quality of life by reducing impairments of body functions and structures, activity limitations, participation restrictions, and environmental barriers. Practice of speech-language pathology does not include the practice of medical diagnosis, medical treatment, or surgery.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 68;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 193.